Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3781.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: ARTICLE 1 DEATH PENALTY PROCEDURES Section 1. new text begin [244A.01] REQUIRING NOTICE BY STATE IN DEATH PENALTY CASES. new text end new text begin If the state intends to seek the death penalty for a capital offense, the prosecuting attorney must sign and file with the court, and serve upon the defendant, a notice that the state will seek the sentence of death in the event of conviction. The notice must be filed and served within a reasonable time before trial or acceptance by the court of a plea of guilty. If the prosecuting attorney does not comply with the notice requirements of this section, the court must not impose the death penalty under section 244A.05. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin [244A.02] APPOINTMENT OF ATTORNEYS IN CAPITAL CASES. new text end new text begin Upon notification under section 244A.01 that the prosecuting attorney intends to seek the death penalty, the court must order the appointment of two attorneys to counsel the defendant, at least one of whom has had significant criminal defense experience, unless the court is satisfied that the defendant has retained a competent attorney. If the defendant is not represented by an attorney and is not able to afford one, the court must order the appropriate district public defender to assign two public defenders. If the defendant is convicted and sentenced to death, the state public defender must represent the defendant during the appeal process. new text end Sec. 3. new text begin [244A.03] SENTENCE OF DEATH FOR CAPITAL OFFENSES; SENTENCING PROCEEDINGS. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definition. new text end new text begin For purposes of this section, "first degree murder" means murder in the first degree as defined in section 609.185. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Capital offenses. new text end new text begin A person who commits any of the following offenses is guilty of a capital offense and is eligible for the death penalty: new text end new text begin (1) murder in the first degree under section 609.185, paragraph (a), clause (2), (3), (4), or (7); new text end new text begin (2) first degree murder and the victim was under six years of age; new text end new text begin (3) first degree murder while escaping or attempting to escape from a prison, jail, or secure treatment facility as defined in section 253B.02, subdivision 18a; new text end new text begin (4) first degree murder and the murder was committed for remuneration or the promise of remuneration or employs another to commit the murder for remuneration or the promise of remuneration; new text end new text begin (5) first degree murder and the person murders more than one person during the criminal transaction or during different criminal transactions but the murders are committed pursuant to the same scheme or course of conduct; new text end new text begin (6) first degree murder of a person in retaliation for or on account of the service or status of the other person as a judge or justice of the supreme court, court of appeals, or a district court; county attorney; or public defender; new text end new text begin (7) first degree murder and the offender has a prior conviction for murder in the first degree or a similar offense under the laws of another jurisdiction; or new text end new text begin (8) first degree murder and the offender has a prior conviction for criminal sexual conduct under section 609.342 or 609.343 against a victim under the age of 12. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Minors. new text end new text begin When a defendant is found guilty of a capital offense, the court must impose a sentence other than death if the defendant was under 18 years of age at the time of the commission of the crime. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin DNA evidence. new text end new text begin A court in a capital offense case must consider all DNA evidence that is offered by the prosecuting attorney or the defendant. The court must also grant each reasonable request by the defendant for forensic testing of biological matter. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Separate sentencing proceeding to determine if death penalty warranted. new text end new text begin (a) If a defendant is convicted of a capital offense, the court must conduct a separate proceeding to determine whether the defendant should be sentenced to death or to a sentence other than death as required by law. The proceeding must be conducted before the court sitting with the jury that determined the defendant's guilt or, if the court, for good cause shown, discharges that jury, with a new jury impaneled for the purpose. new text end new text begin (b) In the proceeding, evidence may be presented about any matter that the court considers relevant to the sentence, including the nature and circumstances of the crime, the defendant's character, background, history, and mental and physical condition. The court may receive any evidence relevant to the sentence, not legally privileged, and that the court considers to have probative force, regardless of its admissibility under the exclusionary rules of evidence. The defendant's counsel must be given a fair opportunity to rebut the evidence. The prosecuting attorney and the defendant or defendant's counsel must be permitted to present arguments for or against a sentence of death. new text end new text begin (c) On conclusion of the presentation of the evidence, the court must submit the following issues to the jury: new text end new text begin (1) whether there is a probability that the defendant would commit criminal acts of violence that would constitute a continuing threat to society; and new text end new text begin (2) in cases in which the jury charge at the guilt or innocence stage permitted the jury to find the defendant guilty for criminal conduct of another, whether the defendant actually caused the death of the deceased or did not actually cause the death of the deceased but intended to kill the deceased or another or anticipated that a human life would be taken. new text end new text begin (d) The state must prove each issue submitted under paragraph (c) beyond a reasonable doubt, and the jury must return a special verdict of "yes" or "no" on each issue submitted under paragraph (c). new text end new text begin (e) The court must charge the jury that: new text end new text begin (1) in deliberating on the issues submitted under paragraph (c), the jury must consider all evidence admitted at the guilt or innocence stage and the punishment stage, including evidence of the defendant's background or character or the circumstances of the offense that militates for or mitigates against the imposition of the death penalty; new text end new text begin (2) the jury must not answer any issue submitted under paragraph (c) "yes" unless the jury agrees unanimously, and the jury must not answer any issue "no" unless ten or more jurors agree; and new text end new text begin (3) members of the jury need not agree on what particular evidence supports a negative answer to any issue submitted under paragraph (c). new text end new text begin (f) The court must instruct the jury that if the jury returns an affirmative finding to each issue submitted under paragraph (c), it must answer the following issue: new text end new text begin Whether, taking into consideration all of the evidence, including the circumstances of the offense, the defendant's character and background, and the personal moral culpability of the defendant, there is a sufficient mitigating circumstance or circumstances to warrant that a sentence of life imprisonment without parole rather than a death sentence be imposed. new text end new text begin (g) The court must: new text end new text begin (1) instruct the jury that if the jury answers that a circumstance or circumstances warrant a sentence of life imprisonment without parole rather than a death sentence be imposed under paragraph (f), the court will sentence the defendant to imprisonment for life without parole; and new text end new text begin (2) charge the jury that a defendant sentenced to confinement for life without parole under this article is ineligible for release on parole. new text end new text begin (h) The court must charge the jury that in answering the issue submitted under paragraph (f), the jury: new text end new text begin (1) must answer the issue "yes" or "no"; new text end new text begin (2) must not answer the issue "no" unless it agrees unanimously and must not answer the issue "yes" unless ten or more jurors agree; new text end new text begin (3) need not agree on what particular evidence supports an affirmative finding on the issue; and new text end new text begin (4) must consider mitigating evidence to be evidence that a juror might regard as reducing the defendant's moral blameworthiness. new text end new text begin (i) If the jury returns an affirmative finding on each issue submitted under paragraph (c) and a negative finding on an issue submitted under paragraph (f), the court must sentence the defendant to death. If the jury returns a negative finding on any issue submitted under paragraph (c), returns an affirmative finding on an issue submitted under paragraph (f), or is unable to answer any issue submitted under paragraph (c) or (f), the court must sentence the defendant to confinement in the Department of Corrections for life imprisonment without parole. new text end Sec. 4. new text begin [244A.04] DEVELOPMENTALLY DISABLED; EXCLUSION FROM DEATH PENALTY. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definition. new text end new text begin As used in this section, "developmentally disabled" means the condition of significantly subaverage general intellectual functioning existing concurrently with significant deficits in adaptive behavior and manifested prior to the age of 18. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Notice; developmentally disabled hearing. new text end new text begin In any case in which the prosecution has provided notice of an intent to seek the death penalty under section 244A.01, the defendant may, at a reasonable time prior to the commencement of trial, apply for an order directing that a developmentally disabled hearing be conducted. The court must promptly conduct a hearing without a jury to determine whether the defendant is developmentally disabled. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Hearing. new text end new text begin At a developmentally disabled hearing, the defendant has the initial burden to present evidence of developmental disability. Once this evidence is presented by the defendant, the burden of proof is on the prosecution to prove beyond a reasonable doubt that the defendant is not developmentally disabled. The defendant may present further evidence in response to the prosecution's case. If the court finds that the prosecution has failed to meet its burden of proof, the court must preclude the death penalty, and a trial thereafter must be conducted as in any other case in which a sentence of death is not sought by the prosecution. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Inadmissibility. new text end new text begin If the defendant is subjected to an examination for purposes of this section, any statement made by the defendant during the examination is inadmissible in evidence against the defendant in any criminal action or proceeding on any issue other than whether the defendant is developmentally disabled. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Developmentally disabled evidence; trial. new text end new text begin A ruling by the court that the death penalty is not precluded under this section must not restrict the defendant's opportunity to introduce evidence of developmental disability during trial or to argue that the evidence should be given mitigating significance. The jury must not be informed of any ruling denying a defendant's motion under this section. new text end Sec. 5. new text begin [244A.05] IMPOSITION OF DEATH SENTENCE; MODE OF EXECUTION. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Decision. new text end new text begin (a) Only the jury sitting as a trier of fact may return a sentence of death. The jury vote for the sentence of death must be unanimous. new text end new text begin (b) The court must instruct the jury on the requirements of this subdivision. At that time, the court must also inform the jury of the nature of the sentence of imprisonment that may be imposed if the jury verdict is against a sentence of death. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Imposition of death. new text end new text begin (a) The court must sentence the defendant to death when the jury unanimously: new text end new text begin (1) finds beyond a reasonable doubt that the offender committed a capital offense; and new text end new text begin (2) recommends that the sentence of death be imposed under section 244A.03, subdivision 5. new text end new text begin (b) If the jury does not recommend a sentence of death, the court must sentence the defendant to imprisonment as provided by law. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Sentence of death precluded. new text end new text begin A sentence of death must not be carried out upon a person who is under 18 years of age at the time the crime was committed. A sentence of death must not be carried out upon a person who, by reason of a mental disease or defect, is unable to understand the impending death or the reasons for it. A sentence of death must not be carried out upon a person who is pregnant. A sentence of death must not be carried out upon a person whom the prosecution has failed to prove not developmentally disabled under section 244A.04. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Execution by lethal injection. new text end new text begin If the court sentences a defendant to death under subdivision 2, the order of execution must be carried out by administration of a continuous, intravenous injection of a lethal quantity of an ultra-fast-acting barbiturate in combination with a chemical paralytic agent until a licensed physician pronounces that the defendant is dead according to accepted standards of medical practice. The execution by lethal injection must be performed by a person selected by the chief executive officer of the maximum security facility at which the execution will take place and trained to administer the injection. The person administering the injection need not be a physician, registered nurse, or licensed practical nurse licensed or registered under the laws of this or another state. new text end Sec. 6. new text begin [244A.06] SENTENCING COURT; ADMINISTRATIVE REQUIREMENTS. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Date of execution. new text end new text begin In pronouncing a sentence of death, the court must set the date of execution not less than 60 days nor more than 90 days from the date the sentence is pronounced. If execution has been stayed by a court and the date set for execution has passed before dissolution of the stay, the court in which the defendant was previously sentenced must, upon dissolution of the stay, set a new date of execution not less than five nor more than 90 days from the day the date is set. The defendant is entitled to be present in court on the day the new date of execution is set. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Copies of order of execution. new text end new text begin When a person is sentenced to death, the court administrator must prepare certified copies of the judgment and order of execution and send these documents to the governor, defendant, defendant's counsel, attorney general, chief justice of the supreme court, state court administrator, and the state public defender's office within five business days following entrance of the order of execution. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Delivery of defendant to maximum security facility. new text end new text begin Pending execution of a sentence of death, the sheriff or other chief law enforcement officer who has custody of the defendant must deliver the defendant to the maximum security facility designated by the commissioner of corrections as the place where the execution is to be held. new text end Sec. 7. new text begin [244A.07] REVIEW OF DEATH SENTENCES BY SUPREME COURT. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Automatic review. new text end new text begin The judgment of conviction and a sentence of death are subject to automatic review by the supreme court within 60 days after certification by the sentencing court of the entire record. The review by the supreme court has priority over all other cases and must be heard in accordance with rules adopted by the supreme court. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Transcript. new text end new text begin The court administrator, within ten days after receiving the transcript, must transmit the entire record and transcript to the supreme court together with a notice prepared by the administrator and a report prepared by the trial judge. The notice must set forth the title and docket number of the case, the name of the defendant, the name and address of the defendant's attorney, a narrative statement of the judgment, the offense, and the punishment prescribed. The report must be in the form of a standard questionnaire prepared and supplied by the supreme court. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Review guidelines; reformation of sentence in capital case. new text end new text begin In determining whether a death sentence should be reformed to a sentence of life without parole, the supreme court must determine whether: new text end new text begin (1) there is legally sufficient evidence to support an affirmative answer to an issue submitted to the jury under section 244A.03, subdivision 5, paragraph (c); or new text end new text begin (2) there is reversible error. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Briefs. new text end new text begin Both the defendant and the state have the right to submit briefs within the time provided by the court and to present oral argument to the court. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Decision. new text end new text begin The supreme court must: new text end new text begin (1) affirm the sentence of death; new text end new text begin (2) reform the sentence to life without parole; or new text end new text begin (3) set the sentence aside and remand the case for resentencing by the trial judge based on the record and argument of counsel. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Notice to governor. new text end new text begin Within five business days after reaching a decision under subdivision 5, the supreme court must notify the governor whether the death sentence has been affirmed, reformed, or set aside. new text end Sec. 8. new text begin [244A.08] UNIFIED REVIEW PROCEDURE. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Procedure. new text end new text begin The supreme court must establish by rule a unified review procedure to provide for the presentation to the sentencing court and to the supreme court of all possible challenges to the trial, conviction, sentence, and detention of defendants upon whom the sentence of death has been or may be imposed. The unified review procedure governs both pretrial and posttrial appellate review of death penalty cases. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Writ of habeas corpus. new text end new text begin Nothing in this section or in the rules of the supreme court limits or restricts the grounds of review or suspends the rights or remedies available through the procedures governing the writ of habeas corpus. new text end Sec. 9. new text begin [244A.09] STAY OF EXECUTION OF DEATH. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Governor or appeal. new text end new text begin The execution of a death sentence may be stayed only by the governor or incident to an appeal. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Proceedings when inmate under sentence of death appears to be mentally ill or pregnant. new text end new text begin If the governor is informed that an inmate under sentence of death may be mentally ill or pregnant, the governor must stay execution of the sentence and require the sentencing court to order a mental or physical examination of the inmate, as appropriate. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Examination and hearing. new text end new text begin (a) If the court orders a mental examination of the inmate, the court must appoint at least one qualified psychiatrist, clinical psychologist, or physician experienced in the field of mental illness to examine the defendant and report on the defendant's mental condition. If the inmate or prosecution has retained a qualified psychiatrist, clinical psychologist, or physician experienced in the field of mental illness, the court on request of the inmate or prosecuting attorney must direct that the psychiatrist, clinical psychologist, or physician be permitted to observe the mental examination and to conduct a mental examination of the inmate. new text end new text begin (b) At the conclusion of the mental examination, the examiner must submit a written report to the court and send copies to the prosecuting attorney and defense attorney. The report must contain a diagnosis of the inmate's mental condition and whether the inmate has the mental capacity to understand the nature of the death penalty and the reasons why it was imposed. new text end new text begin (c) If the court orders a physical examination, it must appoint a qualified physician to examine the inmate and report on whether the inmate is pregnant. new text end new text begin (d) The hearing must be scheduled so that the parties have adequate time to prepare and present arguments regarding the issue of mental illness or pregnancy. The parties may submit written arguments to the court before the date of the hearing and may make oral arguments before the court at the sentencing hearing. Before the hearing, the court must send to the defendant or the defendant's attorney and the prosecuting attorney copies of the mental or physical examination. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Mental illness. new text end new text begin (a) If the court decides that the inmate has the mental capacity to understand the nature of the death penalty and why it was imposed, the court must inform the governor. The governor must issue a warrant to the chief executive officer of the maximum security facility where the execution is to be held directing the officer to execute the sentence at a time designated in the warrant. new text end new text begin (b) If the court decides that the inmate does not have the mental capacity to understand the nature of the death penalty and why it was imposed, the court must inform the governor. The governor must have the inmate transferred to a secure treatment facility as defined in section 253B.02, subdivision 18a. new text end new text begin (c) A person under sentence of death who has been transferred to a secure treatment facility under paragraph (b) must be kept there until the Direct Care and Treatment executive board determines that the person has been restored to mental capacity to understand the nature of the death penalty and the reason it was imposed. The Direct Care and Treatment executive board must then notify the governor of the executive board's determination, and the governor must request the sentencing court to proceed as provided in this section. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Pregnancy. new text end new text begin (a) If the court determines that the inmate is not pregnant, the court must inform the governor. The governor must issue a warrant to the chief executive officer of the maximum security facility where the execution is to be held directing the chief executive officer to execute the sentence at a time designated in the warrant. new text end new text begin (b) If the court determines that the inmate is pregnant, the court must inform the governor. The governor must stay execution of sentence during the pregnancy. new text end new text begin (c) If the court determines that an inmate whose execution has been stayed because of pregnancy is no longer pregnant, the court must inform the governor. The governor must issue a warrant to the chief executive officer directing the chief executive officer to execute the sentence at a time designated in the warrant. new text end Sec. 10. new text begin [244A.10] GOVERNOR'S DUTIES; ISSUANCE OF DEATH WARRANT. new text end new text begin When notified by the supreme court under section 244A.07 that a death sentence has been upheld, the governor must issue a death warrant, attach it to a copy of the record, including the trial court's order of execution and the supreme court's affirming opinion, and send it to the chief executive officer of the maximum security facility where the inmate under sentence of death is being held. The warrant must direct that officer to execute the sentence at a time designated in the warrant. When notified by the supreme court under section 244A.07 that a death sentence has been set aside, the governor must order the commissioner of corrections to remove the inmate under sentence of death from the unit where inmates under sentence of death are confined and reassign the inmate consistent with the supreme court's opinion. new text end Sec. 11. new text begin [244A.11] COMMISSIONER OF CORRECTIONS; DUTIES; DESIGNATION OF PLACE OF EXECUTION. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Maximum security facilities. new text end new text begin The commissioner of corrections must designate one or more maximum security facilities at which executions of inmates under death sentence take place. In each maximum security facility designated as a place where executions take place, the commissioner must establish and maintain a unit for the segregated confinement of inmates under sentence of death. The commissioner may establish a capital punishment unit under the supervision of a deputy or assistant commissioner to administer the functions relating to administering the death penalty under this chapter. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Place of execution. new text end new text begin The chief executive officer of a maximum security facility where executions take place must provide a suitable and efficient room or place in which executions will be carried out that is enclosed from public view and contains all implements necessary to executions. The chief executive officer must select the person to perform executions and the chief executive officer or the officer's designee must supervise the execution. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Executioner's identity; private data. new text end new text begin Information relating to the identity and compensation of the executioner is private data on individuals as defined in section 13.02, subdivision 12. The chief executive officer of the maximum security facility is not required to record the name of an individual acting as an executioner or any information that could identify that individual. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Regulation of execution. new text end new text begin The chief executive officer of the maximum security facility holding an execution or a deputy designated by that officer must be present at the execution. The chief executive officer must set the day for execution within the week designated by the governor in the warrant. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Witness to execution. new text end new text begin Twelve citizens selected by the chief executive officer must witness the execution. The chief executive officer must select six representatives of the news media to witness the execution. Counsel for the inmate under sentence of death and members of the clergy requested by the inmate may be present at the execution. All other persons, except correctional facility officers and the executioner, must be excluded during the execution. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Reading death warrant. new text end new text begin The warrant authorizing the execution must be read to the convicted person immediately before death. new text end new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Return of death warrant of execution issued by governor. new text end new text begin After the death sentence has been executed, the chief executive officer of the maximum security facility where the execution took place must return to the governor the warrant and a signed statement of the execution. The chief executive officer must file an attested copy of the warrant and statement with the court administrator that imposed the sentence. new text end new text begin Subd. 8. new text end new text begin Sentence of death unexecuted for unjustifiable reasons. new text end new text begin If a death sentence is not executed because of unjustified failure of the governor to issue a warrant or for any other unjustifiable reason, on application of the attorney general, the supreme court must issue a warrant directing the sentence to be executed during a week designated in the warrant. new text end new text begin Subd. 9. new text end new text begin Return of warrant of execution issued by supreme court. new text end new text begin After the sentence has been executed under a warrant issued by the supreme court, the chief executive officer of the maximum security facility where the execution took place must return to the supreme court the warrant and a signed statement of the execution. The chief executive officer must file an attested copy of the warrant and statement with the court administrator that imposed the sentence. The chief executive officer must send to the governor an attested copy of the warrant and statement. new text end Sec. 12. new text begin [244A.12] ATTORNEY GENERAL ASSISTANCE. new text end new text begin The attorney general must assist in the prosecution of cases involving the death penalty if requested to do so by the county attorney. new text end Sec. 13. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE.new text end new text begin Sections 1 to 12 are effective August 1, 2026, and apply to crimes committed on or after that date. new text end ARTICLE 2 COMMUTATION OF DEATH PENALTY SENTENCES Section 1. new text begin [638.24] BOARD OF PARDONS; COMMUTATION OF DEATH PENALTY SENTENCES. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Petitions. new text end new text begin (a) The Board of Pardons must hear petitions for commutations of death penalty sentences as provided in this subdivision. new text end new text begin (b) Only the person sentenced to death or the person's counsel may petition the board for commutation. The petition must be in writing, be signed by the person sentenced to death, and include a statement of the grounds upon which the petitioner seeks review. new text end new text begin (c) The state is permitted to respond in writing to the petition as may be established by board rules under subdivision 4. The board must review the petition and determine whether the petition presents a substantial issue that has not been reviewed in the judicial process. new text end new text begin (d) The board must not consider legal issues, including constitutional issues, that: new text end new text begin (1) have been reviewed previously by the courts; new text end new text begin (2) should have been raised during the judicial process; or new text end new text begin (3) if based on new information, are subject to judicial review. new text end new text begin (e) If the board does not find a substantial issue, the board must deny the hearing to the petitioner. If the board finds a substantial issue, the board must conduct a hearing in which the petitioner and the state may present evidence and argument as may be provided by board rules. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Procedures. new text end new text begin (a) A petition for commutation may be filed at any time after the sentencing court has issued an order of execution after completion of an inmate's appeal from conviction. For purposes of this subdivision, "appeal" does not include any action for postconviction relief or any other form of collateral attack. The inmate must file the petition no later than 23 days before the scheduled execution date and must mail a copy by United States mail, postage prepaid, to the attorney representing the state. If the execution date is stayed by any court between the time of the sentencing court's issuance of the warrant and the beginning of the commutation hearing, the hearing must continue and the board must render its decision in accordance with this section. new text end new text begin (b) The petition must include: new text end new text begin (1) the petitioner's name and the address of any attorney who is requesting the petitioner in the commutation proceeding; new text end new text begin (2) a statement of reasons why the petitioner believes the sentence of death is not appropriate due to the specific circumstances pertinent to the petitioner; new text end new text begin (3) whether any of the reasons stated as grounds for the petition have been reviewed in the judicial process; new text end new text begin (4) if new information is alleged, a statement of why the information is considered new, why it could not have been reviewed in the judicial process, and why the information is not still subject to judicial review; new text end new text begin (5) if the petitioner has received one commutation hearing, the petition must include a statement explaining what, if any, new and significant information exists that justifies a second hearing; and new text end new text begin (6) copies of all written evidence upon which the petitioner intends to rely at the hearing, along with the names of all witnesses the petitioner intends to call and a summary of the anticipated testimony. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Board action. new text end new text begin (a) If the board grants the petition, a commutation hearing must be scheduled as soon as reasonably possible. new text end new text begin (b) The board may temporarily stay an execution to fully hear the petition for commutation. new text end new text begin (c) Within seven days of receiving the petition, the attorney general or county attorney must provide to the board and the petitioner copies of all written evidence, names of witnesses, and summary of anticipated testimony. The board may request additional information from either side. new text end new text begin (d) The day after receiving the state's response, the board must hold a prehearing conference to limit the number of witnesses that each side calls, clarify issues that will be addressed, and take whatever other action it considers necessary and appropriate to control and direct proceedings. new text end new text begin (e) The board must place all witnesses under oath and may impose a time limit on each side for presenting its case. During the hearing, the board may take whatever actions it considers necessary and appropriate to maintain order. new text end new text begin (f) The board must reconvene in open session to announce and distribute its written decision. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Rules. new text end new text begin The board must adopt rules to implement the commutation procedures specified in this section. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Decision. new text end new text begin The board may decide that the sentence of death be allowed to stand and be carried out in accordance with law or that the death sentence be commuted to life without the possibility of release. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2026. new text end ARTICLE 3 TECHNICAL AMENDMENTS Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 243.05, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Conditional release. (a) new text begin Except for a person sentenced to death under section 244A.05, new text end the Supervised Release Board may parole any person sentenced to confinement in any state correctional facility for adults under the control of the commissioner of corrections, provided that: (1) no inmate serving a life sentence for committing murder before May 1, 1980, other than murder committed in violation of clause (1) of section 609.185 who has not been previously convicted of a felony shall be paroled without having served 20 years, less the diminution that would have been allowed for good conduct had the sentence been for 20 years; (2) no inmate serving a life sentence for committing murder before May 1, 1980, who has been previously convicted of a felony or though not previously convicted of a felony is serving a life sentence for murder in the first degree committed in violation of clause (1) of section 609.185 shall be paroled without having served 25 years, less the diminution which would have been allowed for good conduct had the sentence been for 25 years; (3) any inmate sentenced prior to September 1, 1963, who would be eligible for parole had the inmate been sentenced after September 1, 1963, shall be eligible for parole; and (4) any new rule or policy or change of rule or policy adopted by the commissioner of corrections which has the effect of postponing eligibility for parole has prospective effect only and applies only with respect to persons committing offenses after the effective date of the new rule or policy or change. (b) Upon being paroled and released, an inmate is and remains in the legal custody and under the control of the commissioner, subject at any time to be returned to a facility of the Department of Corrections established by law for the confinement or treatment of convicted persons and the parole rescinded by the commissioner. (c) The written order of the commissioner of corrections, is sufficient authority for any peace officer, state correctional investigator, or state parole and probation agent to retake and place in actual custody any person on parole or supervised release. In addition, when it appears necessary in order to prevent escape or enforce discipline, any state parole and probation agent or state correctional investigator may, without order of warrant, take and detain a parolee or person on supervised release or work release and bring the person to the commissioner for action. (d) The written order of the commissioner of corrections is sufficient authority for any peace officer, state correctional investigator, or state parole and probation agent to retake and place in actual custody any person on probation under the supervision of the commissioner pursuant to section 609.135. Additionally, when it appears necessary in order to prevent escape or enforce discipline, any state parole and probation agent or state correctional investigator may, without an order, retake and detain a probationer and bring the probationer before the court for further proceedings under section 609.14. (e) The written order of the commissioner of corrections is sufficient authority for any peace officer, state correctional investigator, or state parole and probation agent to detain any person on pretrial release who absconds from pretrial release or fails to abide by the conditions of pretrial release. (f) Persons conditionally released, and those on probation under the supervision of the commissioner of corrections pursuant to section 609.135 may be placed within or outside the boundaries of the state at the discretion of the commissioner of corrections or the court, and the limits fixed for these persons may be enlarged or reduced according to their conduct. (g) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision 1b, in considering applications for conditional release or discharge, the commissioner is not required to hear oral argument from any attorney or other person not connected with an adult correctional facility of the Department of Corrections in favor of or against the parole or release of any inmates. The commissioner may institute inquiries by correspondence, taking testimony, or otherwise, as to the previous history, physical or mental condition, and character of the inmate and, to that end, has the authority to require the attendance of the chief executive officer of any state adult correctional facility and the production of the records of these facilities, and to compel the attendance of witnesses. The commissioner is authorized to administer oaths to witnesses for these purposes. (h) Before revoking a nonviolent controlled substance offender's parole or probation based on a technical violation, when the offender does not present a risk to the public and the offender is amenable to continued supervision in the community, a parole or probation agent must identify community options to address and correct the violation including, but not limited to, inpatient substance use disorder treatment. If a probation or parole agent determines that community options are appropriate and available in the state, the agent must seek to restructure the offender's terms of release to incorporate those options. If an offender on probation stipulates in writing to restructure the terms of release, a probation agent must forward a report to the district court containing: (1) the specific nature of the technical violation of probation; (2) the recommended restructure to the terms of probation; and (3) a copy of the offender's signed stipulation indicating that the offender consents to the restructuring of probation. (i) The recommended restructuring of probation becomes effective when confirmed by a judge. The order of the court is proof of confirmation and amends the terms of the sentence imposed by the court under section 609.135. (j) If a nonviolent controlled substance offender's parole or probation is revoked, the offender's agent must first attempt to place the offender in a local jail. (k) For purposes of paragraphs (h) to (k): (1) "nonviolent controlled substance offender" means a person who meets the criteria described under section 244.0513, subdivision 2, clauses (1), (2), and (5); and (2) "technical violation" means any violation of a court order of probation or a condition of parole, except an allegation of a subsequent criminal act that is alleged in a formal complaint, citation, or petition. Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 609.10, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Sentences available. (a) Upon conviction of a felony and compliance with the other provisions of this chapter new text begin and chapter 244A new text end the court, if it imposes sentence, may sentence the defendant to the extent authorized by law as follows: (1) to new text begin death; ornew text end new text begin (2) to new text end life imprisonment; or deleted text begin (2)deleted text end new text begin (3)new text end to imprisonment for a fixed term of years set by the court; or deleted text begin (3)deleted text end new text begin (4)new text end to both imprisonment for a fixed term of years and payment of a fine; or deleted text begin (4)deleted text end new text begin (5)new text end to payment of a fine without imprisonment or as an intermediate sanction on a stayed sentence; or deleted text begin (5)deleted text end new text begin (6)new text end to payment of court-ordered restitution in addition to either imprisonment or payment of a fine, or both; or deleted text begin (6)deleted text end new text begin (7)new text end to payment of a local correctional fee as authorized under section 609.102 in addition to any other sentence imposed by the court. (b) If the court imposes a fine or orders restitution under paragraph (a), payment is due on the date imposed unless the court otherwise establishes a due date or a payment plan. Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 609.106, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Capital punishment; alternative, life without the possibility of release. new text end new text begin The court must sentence a person to life without the possibility of release if: new text end new text begin (1) the defendant is convicted of a capital offense under section 244A.03; new text end new text begin (2) the defendant is eligible for the death penalty under chapter 244A; and new text end new text begin (3) the jury recommends under section 244A.05, subdivision 2, that the sentence of life without the possibility of release be imposed. new text end Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 609.12, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Authority; conditions. A person sentenced to the commissioner of corrections for imprisonment for a period less than life may be paroled or discharged at any time without regard to length of the term of imprisonment which the sentence imposes when in the judgment of the Supervised Release Board, and under the conditions the board imposes, the granting of parole or discharge would be most conducive to rehabilitation and would be in the public interest.new text begin A person sentenced to death is not eligible for supervised release or discharge at any time.new text end Sec. 5. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 609.135, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Terms and conditions. (a) Except when a sentence of new text begin death has been imposed under chapter 244A, a new text end life deleted text begin imprisonmentdeleted text end new text begin sentencenew text end is required by law, or when a mandatory minimum sentence is required by section 609.11, any court may stay imposition or execution of sentence and: (1) may order intermediate sanctions without placing the defendant on probation; or (2) may place the defendant on probation with or without supervision and on the terms the court prescribes, including intermediate sanctions when practicable. The court may order the supervision to be under the probation officer of the court, or, if there is none and the conviction is for a felony or gross misdemeanor, by the commissioner of corrections, or in any case by some other suitable and consenting person. Unless the court directs otherwise, state parole and probation agents and probation officers may impose community work service or probation violation sanctions, consistent with section 243.05, subdivision 1, or sections 244.197 to 244.199. No intermediate sanction may be ordered performed at a location that fails to observe applicable requirements or standards of chapter 181A or 182, or any rule promulgated under them. (b) For purposes of this subdivision, subdivision 6, and section 609.14, the term "intermediate sanctions" includes but is not limited to incarceration in a local jail or workhouse, home detention, electronic monitoring, intensive probation, sentencing to service, reporting to a day reporting center, chemical dependency or mental health treatment or counseling, restitution, fines, day-fines, community work service, work service in a restorative justice program, work in lieu of or to work off fines and, with the victim's consent, work in lieu of or to work off restitution. (c) A court may not stay the revocation of the driver's license of a person convicted of violating the provisions of section 169A.20. (d) If the court orders a fine, day-fine, or restitution as an intermediate sanction, payment is due on the date imposed unless the court otherwise establishes a due date or a payment plan. (e) The court may prohibit a defendant from using adult-use cannabis flower as defined in section 342.01, subdivision 4, or adult-use cannabis products as defined in section 342.01, subdivision 2, if the defendant undergoes a chemical use assessment and abstinence is consistent with a recommended level of care for the defendant in accordance with the criteria under section 254B.04, subdivision 4. The assessment must be conducted by an assessor qualified under section 245G.11, subdivisions 1 and 5. (f) A court shall not impose an intermediate sanction that has the effect of prohibiting a person from participating in the registry program as defined in section 342.01, subdivision 63. Sec. 6. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 609.185, is amended to read: 609.185 MURDER IN THE FIRST DEGREE. (a) Whoever does any of the following is guilty of murder in the first degree and shallnew text begin , unless sentenced to death under section 244A.05,new text end be sentenced to imprisonment for life: (1) causes the death of a human being with premeditation and with intent to effect the death of the person or of another; (2) causes the death of a human being while committing or attempting to commit criminal sexual conduct in the first or second degree with force or violence, either upon or affecting the person or another; (3) causes the death of a human being with intent to effect the death of the person or another, while committing or attempting to commit burglary, aggravated robbery, carjacking in the first or second degree, kidnapping, arson in the first or second degree, a drive-by shooting, tampering with a witness in the first degree, escape from custody, or any felony violation of chapter 152 involving the unlawful sale of a controlled substance; (4) causes the death of a peace officer, prosecuting attorney, judge, or a guard employed at a Minnesota state or local correctional facility, with intent to effect the death of that person or another, while the person is engaged in the performance of official duties; (5) causes the death of a minor while committing child abuse, when the perpetrator has engaged in a past pattern of child abuse upon a child and the death occurs under circumstances manifesting an extreme indifference to human life; (6) causes the death of a human being while committing domestic abuse, when the perpetrator has engaged in a past pattern of domestic abuse upon the victim or upon another family or household member and the death occurs under circumstances manifesting an extreme indifference to human life; or (7) causes the death of a human being while committing, conspiring to commit, or attempting to commit a felony crime to further terrorism and the death occurs under circumstances manifesting an extreme indifference to human life. (b) For the purposes of paragraph (a), clause (4), "prosecuting attorney" has the meaning given in section 609.221, subdivision 6, clause (4). (c) For the purposes of paragraph (a), clause (4), "judge" has the meaning given in section 609.221, subdivision 6, clause (5). (d) For purposes of paragraph (a), clause (5), "child abuse" means an act committed against a minor victim that constitutes a violation of the following laws of this state or any similar laws of the United States or any other state: section 609.221; 609.222; 609.223; 609.224; 609.2242; 609.342; 609.343; 609.344; 609.345; 609.377; 609.378; or 609.713. (e) For purposes of paragraph (a), clause (6), "domestic abuse" means an act that: (1) constitutes a violation of section 609.221, 609.222, 609.223, 609.224, 609.2242, 609.342, 609.343, 609.344, 609.345, 609.713, or any similar laws of the United States or any other state; and (2) is committed against the victim who is a family or household member as defined in section 518B.01, subdivision 2, paragraph (b). (f) For purposes of paragraph (a), clause (7), "further terrorism" has the meaning given in section 609.714, subdivision 1. Sec. 7. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE.new text end new text begin Sections 1 to 6 are effective August 1, 2026, and apply to crimes committed on or after that date. new text end